Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1022
Attachment; sheriff; powers when no receiver appointed; bond.

When a receiver is not appointed by the court or a judge thereof, as provided in section 25-1018, the sheriff or other officer attaching the property shall have all the powers and perform all the duties of a receiver appointed by the court or judge, and may, if necessary, commence and maintain actions in his own name as such officer. He may be required to give security other than his official undertaking.

R.S.1867, Code § 217, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 7751;

C.S.1922, § 8695;

C.S.1929, § 20-1022;

R.S.1943, § 25-1022.